Montana, session 2025, HB936.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 50-1-119, MCA, is amended to read:
"50-1-119. Behavioral health system for future generations fund. (1) There is an account in the
state special revenue fund established in 17-2-102 to be known as the behavioral health system for future
generations fund.
(2) There must be deposited in the account money received from legislative general fund transfers.
(3) Eligible uses of the fund include:
(a) medicaid and CHIP matching funds for payments made to behavioral health settings;
(b) medicaid and CHIP matching funds for payments made to intermediate care facilities for
individuals with intellectual disabilities;
(c) statewide community-based investments to stabilize behavioral health and developmental
disabilities service providers and delivery, increase and strengthen the behavioral health and developmental
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 936
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 936
disabilities workforce, increase service capacity to meet identified behavioral health and developmental
disabilities services demands, and increase opportunities for Montanans to receive integrated physical and
behavioral health care;
(d) acquisition of new or remodeling of existing infrastructure or property to support the
establishment of behavioral health settings and intermediate care facilities for individuals with intellectual
disabilities;
(e) planning, operation, or other contract expenses associated with intermediate care facilities for
individuals with intellectual disabilities;
(f) planning, operation, or other contract expenses associated with behavioral health settings; and
(g) studying and planning of the development of a comprehensive behavioral health system;
(h) offering student loan repayment programs for nurses, licensed practical nurses, and
psychiatrists at state health facilities and prioritizing employees at the Montana state hospital for the programs;
and
(i) providing additional licensed beds at the Montana state hospital.
(4) (a) Funds in this account may not be used to operate existing state facilities.
(b) Student loan repayments and the addition of licensed beds are not considered operating
expenses for the purposes of this section."
Section 2. Near-term initiatives. The department of public health and human services shall continue
using its approved funding for behavioral health system for future generations near-term initiative number one
to support community-based court-ordered evaluations and clinical stabilization services in local detention
facilities.
Section 3. Reporting -- comprehensive school and community treatment services to children.
The department of public health and human services shall develop and report patient-centered health outcome
measures and total costs for each program and for each child for comprehensive school and community
treatment services to children. The report shall be provided on a quarterly basis to the health and human
services interim budget committee and the children, families, health, and human services interim committee.
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 936
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 936
Section 4. Montana state hospital reporting. (1) Starting July 1, 2025, and each month thereafter,
the department of public health and human services shall submit a written report on the Montana state hospital.
The report must outline the department's hiring efforts and following data:
(a) the number of applications received;
(b) the number of qualified applicants;
(c) the number of interviews conducted; and
(d) the number of new employees hired.
(2) The monthly reports must be submitted to the legislative finance committee, the interim budget
committee section B, and the interim budget committee section F.
"53-6-149. State special revenue fund account -- administration. (1) There is a hospital medicaid
reimbursement account in the state special revenue fund provided for in 17-2-102.
(2) All money collected under 15-66-102 [, except for the money deposited pursuant to 15-66- 102
(3)(b) into the Montana HELP Act special revenue account provided for in 53-6-1315,] must be deposited in the
account.
(3) Money in the account must be used by the department of public health and human services to
provide funding [no later than May 5 of each year] for increases in medicaid payments to hospitals and for the
costs of collection of the fee and other administrative activities associated with the implementation of increases
in the medicaid payments to hospitals. (Bracketed language terminates June 30, 2025, on occurrence of
contingency--sec. 48, Ch. 415, L. 2019.) "
Section 5. Long-term sustainability of HB 872 study -- committee. (1) During the interim following
the 69th legislative session, there is a House Bill No. 872 long-term sustainability committee to analyze and
propose mechanisms to provide sustainable funding for long-term objectives of House Bill No. 872 to the
executive branch and to the legislative finance committee in preparation for the 70th legislative session.
(2) The committee consists of the following members:
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 936
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 936
(a) the chair of the health and human services appropriations joint subcommittee;
(b) four members of the health and human services appropriations joint subcommittee, with one
appointed by the speaker of the house, and one appointed by the minority leader of the house, one appointed
by the president of the senate, and one appointed by the minority leader of the senate, in consultation with the
chair of the health and human services appropriations joint subcommittee;
(c) the director of the department of public health and human services, or the director's designee;
(d) the medicaid bureau chief; and
(e) the budget director or the director's designee.
(3) The department of public health and human services shall staff the committee and pay for the
operational costs of the committee.
(4) The office of budget and program planning and the legislative fiscal division shall provide
research and analysis at the request of the committee.
(5) The committee shall elect a presiding officer from one of the members who is a legislator and
elect a vice presiding officer.
(6) Starting June 1, 2025, the committee shall meet every 2 months and may meet remotely.
(7) The committee shall reserve time at each committee meeting for public comment. Public
participation is encouraged.
Section 6. Coordination instruction. The appropriation in House Bill No. 2 for certified community
behavioral health centers is contingent on the passage and approval of House Bill No. 574. If House Bill No.
574 is not passed and approved, the appropriation in House Bill No. 2 is void.
Section 7. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
Section 8. Termination. [This act] terminates June 30, 2027.
- END -
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 936
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 936, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 936
INTRODUCED BY J. GILLETTE
AN ACT IMPLEMENTING THE PROVISIONS OF THE GENERAL APPROPRIATIONS ACT; REQUIRING THAT
A PORTION OF THE HOSPITAL UTILIZATION FEE BE USED FOR HOSPITAL QUALITY AND EFFICIENCY
INCENTIVE PAYMENTS; REQUIRING THAT A PORTION OF THE HOSPITAL UTILIZATION FEE BE USED
FOR PAYMENTS TO INDEPENDENT NONAFFILIATED CRITICAL ACCESS HOSPITALS; ALLOWING LOAN
REPAYMENT AND FUNDING FOR ADDITIONAL BEDS AT THE MONTANA STATE HOSPITAL TO BE
ELIGIBLE USES OF THE BEHAVIORAL HEALTH SYSTEM FOR FUTURE GENERATIONS FUND ON A ONE-
TIME BASIS; PROVIDING FOR A STUDY ON THE LONG-TERM SUSTAINABILITY OF OBJECTIVES IN HB
872; ESTABLISHING REPORTING REQUIREMENTS; AMENDING SECTIONS SECTION 50-1-119 AND 53-6-
149, MCA; AND PROVIDING AN EFFECTIVE DATE AND A TERMINATION DATE.”